Utah statutes.
7-2-1.   Supervisory actions by commissioner -- Grounds -- Mergers or
acquisitions authorized by commissioner -- Possession of business and property
taken by commissioner.
(1)  An institution under the jurisdiction of the department is subject to
supervisory actions by the commissioner under this chapter or Chapter 19 if
the commissioner, with or without an administrative hearing, finds that:
(a)  the institution is not in a safe and sound condition to transact its
business;
(b)  an officer of the institution or other person has refused to be examined
or has made false statements under oath regarding its affairs;
(c)  the institution or other person has violated its articles of
incorporation or any law, rule, or regulation governing the institution or
other person;
(d)  the institution or other person is conducting its business in an
unauthorized or unsafe manner, or is practicing deception upon its depositors,
members, or the public, or is engaging in conduct injurious to its depositors,
members, or the public;
(e)  the institution or other person has been notified by its primary account
insurer of the insurer's intention to initiate proceedings to terminate
insurance;
(f)  the institution or other person has failed to maintain a minimum amount
of capital as required by the department, any state, or the relevant federal
regulatory agency;
(g)  the institution or other person is a depository institution that has
failed or refused to pay its depositors in accordance with the terms under
which the deposits were received, or has or is about to become insolvent;
(h)  the institution or other person or its officers or directors have failed
or refused to comply with the terms of a legally authorized order issued by
the commissioner or by any federal authority or authority of another state
having jurisdiction over the institution or other person;
(i)  the institution or other person or its officers or directors have failed
or refused, upon proper demand, to submit its records, books, papers, and
affairs for inspection to the commissioner or to a supervisor or an examiner
of the department;
(j)  the institution or other person or its officers or directors, after 30
days written notice, have failed to comply with or have continued to violate
this title or any rule or regulation of the department issued under it;
(k)  any person who controls the institution or other person subject to the
jurisdiction of the department has used the control to cause the institution
or other person to be or about to be in an unsafe or unsound condition, to
conduct its business in an unauthorized or unsafe manner, or to violate this
title or any rule or regulation of the department issued under it; or
(l)  the remedies provided in Section 7-1-307, 7-1-308, or 7-1-313 are
ineffective or impracticable to protect the interest of depositors, creditors,
or members of the institution or other person, or to protect the interests of
the public.
(2)  The commissioner may take any action described in Subsection (3) if:
(a)  he finds that:
(i)  any of the conditions set forth in Subsection (1) exist with respect to
an institution under the jurisdiction of the department; and
(ii)  an order issued pursuant to Section 7-1-307, 7-1-308, or 7-1-313 would
not adequately protect the interests of the institution's depositors,
creditors, members, or other interested persons from all dangers presented by
the conditions found to exist; or
(b)  two-thirds of the voting shares of an institution under the jurisdiction
of the department that are eligible to be voted at any regular or special
meeting of the shareholders of the institution are voted at the meeting in
favor of a resolution consenting to the commissioner taking or causing to be
taken any of the actions described below.
(3)  After making the requisite findings or receiving the consenting vote of
shareholders under Subsection (2), the commissioner may:
(a)  without taking possession of the institution, authorize, or by order
require or give effect to the acquisition of control of, the merger with, the
acquisition of all or a portion of the assets of, or the assumption of all or
a portion of the liabilities of the institution or other person by any other
institution or entity approved or designated by the commissioner in accordance
with Chapter 19; or
(b)  take possession of the institution or other person subject to the
jurisdiction of the department with or without a court order if an acquisition
of control of, a merger with, an acquisition of all or a portion of the assets
of, or an assumption of all or a portion of the liabilities of the institution
or other person without taking possession does not appear to the commissioner
to be practicable.
(4)  Upon taking possession of an institution or the person, the commissioner
is vested by operation of law with the title to and the right to possession of
all assets, the business, and property of the institution or other person
subject to court order made under Section 7-2-3.  While in possession of an
institution or other person, the commissioner or any receiver or liquidator
appointed by him may exercise any or all of the rights, powers, and
authorities granted to the commissioner under this chapter, or may give effect
to the acquisition of control of, the merger with, the acquisition of all or a
portion of the assets of, or the assumption of all or a portion of the
liabilities of an institution or other person subject to the jurisdiction of
the department, under the provisions of Chapter 19.
(5)  An action of the commissioner under this section may only be enjoined or
set aside upon a finding, after notice and hearing, that the action is
arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion, or otherwise contrary to law.
